Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201817-108
Officers and employees; salaries.

The officers and employees of a city of the second class shall receive such compensation as the mayor and city council shall fix by ordinance.

Laws 1879, § 7, p. 195;

Laws 1881, c. 23, § 2, p. 168;

Laws 1911, c. 16, § 1, p. 133;

R.S.1913, § 5000;

Laws 1919, c. 46, § 1, p. 130;

C.S.1922, § 4169;

C.S.1929, § 17-108;

Laws 1935, c. 36, § 3, p. 149;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 17-108;

Laws 1943, c. 30, § 2, p. 140;

R.S.1943, § 17-108;

Laws 1945, c. 25, § 1, p. 134;

Laws 1947, c. 31, § 1(1), p. 140;

Laws 1949, c. 21, § 1, p. 92;

Laws 1953, c. 33, § 1, p. 123;

Laws 1969, c. 89, § 1, p. 452;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 6.

To employ an attorney as a private practitioner, who is also city attorney, to foreclose tax sale certificates on a percent basis violates this and other sections, though, in proper cases, he may collect for his services on basis of quantum meruit. Darnell v. City of Broken Bow, 139 Neb. 844, 299 N.W. 274 (1941).

Provision for compensation of employees is not required to be in writing, and may be fixed at time of employment. Morearty v. City of McCook, 117 Neb. 113, 219 N.W. 839 (1928).

While the statute does not fix the salary of the mayor, it directs that the mayor and other officers named shall receive salaries to be fixed by ordinance. Dean v. State ex rel. Miller, 56 Neb. 301, 76 N.W. 555 (1898).